Arkansas, session 2025, HB1077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 29, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-29-121. Required survey and notification for incarceration of
veteran.
(a)(1) Within fourteen (14) days of the initial incarceration of a
person, the administrator of the correctional facility with custody of the
person, the designee of the administrator of the correctional facility with
custody of the person, or the county veteran service officer of the county in
which the person is in custody shall verify the veteran status of the person
by using data made available from the Veterans Reentry Search Service
operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or a similar
*CEB041*
04-02-2025 14:22:41 CEB041

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1077
service.
(2) If the administrator of the correctional facility with
custody of the person designates the county veteran service officer to verify
the veteran status of the person under subdivision (a)(1) of this section,
the administrator shall provide the information necessary for the county
veteran service officer to conduct the verification.
(b) The administrator of a correctional facility with custody of a
person identified as a veteran, the designee of the administrator of the
correctional facility with custody of the person identified as a veteran, or
the county veteran service officer of the county in which the person
identified as a veteran is in custody shall by mail, email, or fax send
written notice of the person's incarceration to the Department of Veterans
Affairs within forty-five (45) days of the person's initial incarceration if:
(1) The person is still in custody; and
(2) The person's sentence of incarceration is six (6) months or
more or the administrator of the correctional facility or his or her designee
reasonably believes that the person will remain in custody for six (6) months
or more.
(c) Upon the release from custody of a person identified as a veteran
who has been incarcerated for at least six (6) months, the administrator of
the correctional facility from which the person was released, the designee of
the administrator of the correctional facility from which the person was
released, or the county veteran service officer of the county in which the
person was in custody shall by mail, email, or fax send written notice of the
person's release from custody to the Department of Veterans Affairs.
(d) The administrator of a correctional facility shall provide
reasonable access to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and the
Department of Veterans Affairs to assist an inmate who is a veteran in
applying for:
(1) Federal or state benefits, compensation, or treatment for
which the inmate may be eligible; or
(2) Treatment through a veterans treatment specialty court
program under § 16-101-101 et seq. or another specialty court program
authorized by the Supreme Court under § 16-10-139.
(e) The administrator of a correctional facility shall make available
upon request the results of his or her verification under subdivision (a)(1)
04-02-2025 14:22:41 CEB041

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1077
of this section to a prosecuting attorney, a managing public defender, a
coordinator of a specialty court program authorized by the Supreme Court
under § 16-10-139, or the Administrative Office of the Courts.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 41, Subchapter 1 is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-41-111. Required survey and notification for incarceration of
veteran.
(a)(1) Within fourteen (14) days of the initial incarceration of a
person, the administrator of the local correctional facility with custody of
the person, the designee of the administrator of the local correctional
facility with custody of the person, or the county veteran service officer of
the county in which the person is in custody shall verify the veteran status
of the person by using data made available from the Veterans Reentry Search
Service operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or a
similar service.
(2) If the administrator of the local correctional facility with
custody of the person designates the county veteran service officer to verify
the veteran status of the person under subdivision (a)(1) of this section,
the administrator shall provide the information necessary for the county
veteran service officer to conduct the verification.
(b) The administrator of a local correctional facility with custody of
a person identified as a veteran, the designee of the administrator of the
local correctional facility with custody of the person identified as a
veteran, or the county veteran service officer of the county in which the
person identified as a veteran is in custody shall by mail, email, or fax
send written notice of the person's incarceration to the Department of
Veterans Affairs within forty-five (45) days of the person's initial
incarceration if:
(1) The person is still in custody; and
(2) The person's sentence of incarceration is six (6) months or
more or the administrator of the local correctional facility or his or her
designee reasonably believes that the person will remain in custody for six
(6) months or more.
(c) Upon the release from custody of a person identified as a veteran
who has been incarcerated for at least six (6) months, the administrator of
04-02-2025 14:22:41 CEB041

As Engrossed: H4/2/25 HB1077
the local correctional facility from which the person was released, the
designee of the administrator of the local correctional facility from which
the person was released, or the county veteran service officer of the county
in which the person was in custody shall by mail, email, or fax send written
notice of the person's release from custody to the Department of Veterans
Affairs.
(d) The administrator of a local correctional facility shall provide
reasonable access to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and the
Department of Veterans Affairs to assist an inmate who is a veteran in
applying for:
(1) Federal or state benefits, compensation, or treatment for
which the inmate may be eligible; or
(2) Treatment through a veterans treatment specialty court
program under § 16-101-101 et seq. or other specialty court program
authorized by the Supreme Court under § 16-10-139.
(e) The administrator of a local correctional facility shall make
available upon request the results of his or her verification under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section to a prosecuting attorney, a managing
public defender, a coordinator of a specialty court program authorized by the
Supreme Court under § 16-10-139, or the Administrative Office of the Courts.

/s/Hudson














04-02-2025 14:22:41 CEB041